Florida, session 2026, SB840.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 252.422, Florida Statutes, is amended to 28 read: 29 252.422âRestrictions on county or municipal regulations 30 after a hurricane.â 31 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âimpacted local 32 governmentâ means a county listed in a federal disaster 33 declaration located entirely or partially within 50 100 miles of 34 the track of a storm declared to be a hurricane by the National 35 Hurricane Center while the storm was categorized as a hurricane 36 and which was listed in a federal major disaster declaration 37 pursuant to the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency 38 Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 5121 et seq., or a municipality 39 located within such a county. 40 (2)âFor 1 year after a hurricane makes landfall in this 41 state, an impacted local government may not propose or adopt: 42 (a)âEnforce a moratorium that prevents or delays the repair 43 or on construction, reconstruction, or redevelopment of an 44 existing improvement damaged by such hurricane, unless the 45 moratorium is imposed for the purpose of addressing stormwater 46 or flood water management, potable water supply, or necessary 47 repairs to or replacement of sanitary sewer systems any 48 property. 49 (b)âRequire the repair or reconstruction of an existing 50 improvement damaged by such hurricane to comply with an A more 51 restrictive or burdensome amendment to its comprehensive plan or 52 land development regulations which was first effective after 53 such hurricane made landfall in this state. 54 (c)âEnforce a change to a more restrictive or burdensome 55 procedure concerning review, approval, or issuance of a site 56 plan, development permit, or development order, to the extent 57 that those terms are defined in s. 163.3164, which increases the 58 timeframe for the impacted local government to take final action 59 on such review, approval, or issuance and which is effective 60 after such hurricane makes landfall in this state. 61 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), a comprehensive plan 62 amendment, land development regulation amendment, site plan, 63 development permit, or development order approved or adopted by 64 an impacted local government before or after June 26, 2025, may 65 be enforced if: 66 (a)âThe associated application is initiated by a private 67 party other than the impacted local government and the property 68 that is the subject of the application is owned by the 69 initiating private party; 70 (b)âThe proposed comprehensive plan amendment was submitted 71 to reviewing agencies pursuant to s. 163.3184 before landfall; 72 or 73 (c)âThe proposed comprehensive plan amendment or land 74 development regulation is approved by the state land planning 75 agency for an area of critical state concern designated pursuant 76 to chapter 380; pursuant to s. 380.05. 77 (c)âThe adoption of the comprehensive plan amendment or 78 land development regulation amendment is required to comply with 79 state or federal law; or 80 (d)âThe adoption of the comprehensive plan amendment or 81 land development regulation implements a floodplain management 82 standard consistent with 44 C.F.R. part 60, relating to the 83 National Flood Insurance Program. 84 (4)âThe prohibitions of paragraphs (2)(b) and (c) apply 85 only to property damaged to such an extent that a permit is 86 required for the repair or reconstruction of the existing 87 improvement. An impacted local government may require a property 88 owner to provide documentation demonstrating that the property 89 was damaged by a hurricane, including, but not limited to, 90 documents produced by property appraisers, insurers, or local 91 building inspectors. 92 (a)âAny person may file suit against any impacted local 93 government for declaratory and injunctive relief to enforce this 94 section. 95 (b)âA county or municipality may request a determination by 96 a court of competent jurisdiction as to whether such action 97 violates this section. Upon such a request, the county or 98 municipality may not enforce the action until the court has 99 issued a preliminary or final judgment determining whether the 100 action violates this section. 101 (c)âBefore a plaintiff may file suit, the plaintiff shall 102 notify the impacted local government by setting forth the facts 103 upon which the complaint or petition is based and the reasons 104 the impacted local governmentâs action violates this section. 105 Upon receipt of the notice, the impacted local government shall 106 have 14 days to withdraw or revoke the action at issue or 107 otherwise declare it void. If the impacted local government does 108 not withdraw or revoke the action at issue within the time 109 prescribed, the plaintiff may file suit. The plaintiff shall be 110 entitled to entry of a preliminary injunction to prevent the 111 impacted local government from implementing the challenged 112 action during pendency of the litigation. In any action 113 instituted pursuant to this paragraph, the prevailing plaintiff 114 shall be entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs. 115 (d)âIn any case brought under this section, all parties are 116 entitled to the summary procedure provided in s. 51.011, and the 117 court shall advance the cause on the calendar. 118 (5)âThis section may not be construed to restrict a local 119 government from adopting or enforcing changes to the Florida 120 Building Code or local technical amendments adopted pursuant to 121 s. 553.73(4) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and 122 Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall conduct a study on 123 actions taken by local governments after hurricanes which are 124 related to comprehensive plans, land development regulations, 125 and procedures for review, approval, or issuance of site plans, 126 permits, or development orders. The study must focus on the 127 impact that local governmental actions, including moratoriums, 128 ordinances, and procedures, have had or may have on 129 construction, reconstruction, or redevelopment of any property 130 damaged by hurricanes. In its research, OPPAGA shall survey 131 stakeholders that play integral parts in the rebuilding and 132 recovery process. OPPAGA shall make recommendations for 133 legislative options to remove impediments to the construction, 134 reconstruction, or redevelopment of any property damaged by a 135 hurricane and prevent the implementation by local governments of 136 burdensome or restrictive procedures and processes. OPPAGA shall 137 submit the report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker 138 of the House of Representatives by December 1, 2025. 139 Section 2.âSection 28 of chapter 2025-190, Laws of Florida, 140 is amended to read: 141 Section 28.â(1)âEach county listed in the Federal Disaster 142 Declaration for Hurricane Debby (DR-4806), Hurricane Helene (DR 143 4828), or Hurricane Milton (DR-4834), and each municipality 144 within one of those counties, may not propose or adopt any 145 moratorium on construction, reconstruction, or redevelopment of 146 any property damaged by such hurricanes; propose or adopt more 147 restrictive or burdensome amendments to its comprehensive plan 148 or land development regulations; or propose or adopt more 149 restrictive or burdensome procedures concerning review, 150 approval, or issuance of a site plan, development permit, or 151 development order, to the extent that those terms are defined by 152 s. 163.3164, Florida Statutes, before June 30, 2026 October 1, 153 2027, and any such moratorium or restrictive or burdensome 154 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 155 procedure shall be null and void ab initio. This subsection 156 applies retroactively to August 1, 2024. 157 (2)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), any comprehensive plan 158 amendment, land development regulation amendment, site plan, 159 development permit, or development order approved or adopted by 160 a county or municipality before or after the effective date of 161 this act may be enforced if: 162 (a)âThe associated application is initiated by a private 163 party other than the county or municipality. 164 (b)âThe property that is the subject of the application is 165 owned by the initiating private party. 166 (3)(a)âA resident of or the owner of a business in a county 167 or municipality may bring a civil action for declaratory and 168 injunctive relief against the county or municipality for a 169 violation of this section. Pending adjudication of the action 170 and upon filing of a complaint showing a violation of this 171 section, the resident or business owner is entitled to a 172 preliminary injunction against the county or municipality 173 preventing implementation of the moratorium or the comprehensive 174 plan amendment, land development regulation, or procedure. If 175 such civil action is successful, the resident or business owner 176 is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs. 177 (b)âAttorney fees and costs and damages may not be awarded 178 pursuant to this subsection if: 179 1.âThe resident or business owner provides the governing 180 body of the county or municipality written notice that a 181 proposed or enacted moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, 182 land development regulation, or procedure is in violation of 183 this section; and 184 2.âThe governing body of the county or municipality 185 withdraws the proposed moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, 186 land development regulation, or procedure within 14 days; or, in 187 the case of an adopted moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, 188 land development regulation, or procedure, the governing body of 189 a county or municipality notices an intent to repeal within 14 190 days after receipt of the notice and repeals the moratorium, 191 comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or 192 procedure within 14 days thereafter. 193 (4)âThis section expires June 30, 2026 2028. 194 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.